Utah statutes.
32B-12-202.   Application requirements for liquor warehousing license.

To obtain a liquor warehousing license, a person shall submit to the department:

(1)  a written application in a form prescribed by the department;

(2)  a nonrefundable $300 application fee;

(3)  an initial license fee of $850, which is refundable if a liquor warehousing license is not issued;

(4)  written consent of the local authority;

(5)  a copy of the person's current business license;

(6)  a bond as specified by Section 32B-12-206;

(7)  a floor plan of the person's warehouse, including the area in which the person proposes that liquor be stored;

(8)  evidence that the person is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(9)  a signed consent form stating that the liquor warehousing licensee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the licensed premises;

(10)  if the person is an entity, proper verification evidencing that a person who signs the application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(11)  any other information the commission or department may require.

